Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.06.020

Terms of class or series.

(1) If the articles of incorporation so provide, the board of directors may determine, in whole or part, the preferences, limitations, voting powers, and relative rights, within the limits set forth in RCW 23B.06.010(1)(b) and this section of (a) any class of shares before the issuance of any shares of that class, or (b) one or more series within a class, and designate the number of shares within that series, before the issuance of any shares of that series.

(2) Each series of a class must be given a distinguishing designation.

(3) All shares of a series must have preferences, limitations, voting powers, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same series, except to the extent otherwise permitted by RCW 23B.06.010(1)(b). All shares of a series must have preferences, limitations, voting powers, and relative rights identical with those of shares of other series of the same class, except to the extent otherwise provided in the description of the series.

(4) Before issuing any shares of a class or series created under this section, the corporation must deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment, which are effective without shareholder approval, that set forth:

(a) The name of the corporation;

(b) The text of the amendment determining the terms of the class or series of shares;

(c) The date it was adopted; and

(d) The statement that the amendment was duly adopted by the board of directors.

(5) Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the board of directors may, after the issuance of shares of a series whose number it is authorized to designate, amend the resolution establishing the series to decrease, but not below the number of shares of such series then outstanding, the number of authorized shares of that series, by filing articles of amendment, which are effective without shareholder approval, in the manner provided in subsection (4) of this section.

[ 2009 c 189 s 6; 1998 c 104 s 2; 1989 c 165 s 45.]